Hawaii, session 2026, GM1140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 431, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to article 10, part II, to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
"§431:10- Explanation of premium increase. Insurers
shall reasonably explain changes in premium upon written request
by the policyholder for any premium increase at renewal."
SECTION 2. Section 431:9-235, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§431:9-235 [Denial,—siispeneienT—3?e-voeati-on—of licenses. ]
Disciplinary licensing actions. (a) The commissioner may deny,
place on probation, suspend, revoke, or refuse to [extend] issue
or renew any license issued under this article and may levy a
civil penalty in accordance with section 431:9-238 for any cause
specified in any other provision of this article, or for any of
the following causes:
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO
liiiMniniiniiiiniii

Page 2 HI I.. B. IN O.
g
C.D. 1
[-{4-}- For any gquoc for which iaouancc of the lioonoG could
have been rcfuocd had-it then cxiotcd and been known
to the commioaioncr;
42-)- -I-f—the licenacc- wilfully ■viol-atco or 4<nowingly
participatGO in—the—violation ©f—any-p-roviaion of thio
code;
- {44 if—the—liGcnaoG haa obtained or attcmp-feed to—obtain
any liGcnoG io-auod under thio—article through-wilful-
rniaroproocntation or f-iraud/—or hao fa-i-led to paoo an-y
examination required by ocction 431;9-206;"
- (-4-)- If the liccnocG haO' mieappropriatod,—een-vertcd to the
li-ee-R-oec ' 0 own uoc,—or—illegally withheld moncyo
required to be-held in a fiduciary capacity;
- {44 If the liccnoee-/—with intent deceive,—hae
materially miorepreoonhed-iLhe- termo or effect of any
inourance cont-ract;—or hae engaged or-io about to
engage—in any fraudulent tranoaction;'
- {44 If the licenacc hao been-feund-te have committed any
unfair—practice or fraud ao defined in article 13;]
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO
■iiiniainniiiiiiHiiH

Page 3 2282
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) Providing incorrect^ misleading, incomplete, or
materially untrue information in the license
application;
(2) Violating any law, or violating any rule, subpoena, or
order of the commissioner or of another state's
commissioner;
(3) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license through
misrepresentation or fraud;
(4) Improperly withholding, misappropriating, or
converting any moneys or properties received in the
course of doing business;
(5) Intentionally misrepresenting the terms of an actual
insurance contract;
(6) Having been convicted of a felony;
(7) Having admitted to or be found to have committed any
insurance unfair trade practice or fraud;
(8) Using fraudulent, coercive, or dishonest practice or
demonstrating incompetence, untrustworthiness, or
financial irresponsibility in the conduct of business
in this State or elsewhere;
2026-3334 HB2282 GDI HMSO

iiiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiin

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(9) Having an adjuster or independent bill reviewer
license or its equivalent denied/ placed on probation^
suspended, or revoked in any other state/ province/
district/ or territory;
(10) Forging another's name on an application or on any
document related to a transaction;
(11) Improperly using notes or any other reference material
while taking an examination for an insurance license;
(12) Accepting insurance business from a person who is not
licensed;
(13) Failing to comply with an administrative or court
order imposing a child support obligation;
(14) Failing to pay federal or state income taxes or
failing to comply with any administrative or court
order directing payment of federal or state income
taxes;
(15) For any cause for which issuance of the license could
have been refused had it then existed and been known
to the commissioner;
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO
■■IWIHIinillllllMIHH

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
[ (7)■] (16) If in the conduct of the licensee's affairs
under the license, the licensee has shown oneself to
be a source of injury and loss to the public; or
[-W-] (17) If the licensee has dealt with, or attempted to
deal with, insurance or to exercise powers relative to
insurance outside the scope of the licensee's
licenses.
(b) [The—l-aeenoG of any par-t-norohip or corporation may bo
□uoponded?—rovokod,—or r-ofuocd for any-of tho causoo that relate
to any individual dooignatod in thc li-conoc to oxereioe its
powers.] The commissioner may act pursuant to subsection (a) by
an order; provided that before issuing the order, the
commissioner shall notify the applicant or licensee in writing
of the commissioner's intent to act under subsection (a). The
applicant or licensee may make written application to the
commissioner for a hearing before the commissioner to determine
the reasonableness of the commissioner's action within ten days
of the date of receipt of the notice. The hearing shall be held
within thirty days of receipt of the written application and
shall be held pursuant to chapter 91. If no written application
for a hearing is made to the commissioner within ten days of
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO 5

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
receipt of the notice, the commissioner may proceed with issuing
the order and, unless otherwise provided by law, the
commissioner shall without further review or hearing renew,
reinstate, or grant the license only upon receipt of an
authorization from the administering agency.
(c) The holder of any license, which has been revoked or
suspended, shall surrender the license certificate to the
commissioner at the commissioner's request.
[-H4-- The cemmiooioner may ouopcndz—revetei—or rofuoo to
extend' any license-for any causo apccif-iod in thio articlo by an
order;
-Hr)- Gi-vcnto-tho liccnoec-at Icaot f if tee'S—dayo pr-ior to
the—er^er^J-s—e^ieetrive—datOT—oubjcct to the right of
the liocnsoo to have a—hearing.ao provided in oection
431;2-308 .-- The lieonse-ohall bo ouopended pending the
hearing;—ar
4^ Made after a hearing ao provided in'section -4^; 2-30^.
The effective date of —the--order ohall be ton dayo
after the -date the order- io given to the liccnooc.
The—erder^aftay—fee—appealed—fee-^the—eireait—eeart—ef-^the
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO 6

Page 7 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
firot -j-udicial circuit of thio State ao provi-dod in
chapter 91.]
(d) The conunissioner shall retain the authority to enforce
the provisions of^ and impose any penalty or remedy authorized
byz this chapter or chapter 432 or 4320^ against any person who
is under investigation for or charged with a violation of this
chapter or chapter 432 or 4320^ even if that person's license or
registration has been surrendered or has lapsed by operation of
law."
SECTION 3. Section 431:9-238, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
" (a) In addition to or in lieu of [suspenaion,—reveeatieftr-
or rcfuoal to ex-tond any liccnoo,—a^ter^-a—hearing-r] an action by
the commissioner under section 431:9-235, the commissioner may
levy a fine upon the applicant or licensee in an amount [net-] of
no less than $100 and [net:] more than $10,000."
SECTION 4. Section 431:9A-112, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) [If the commiaaioncr takco'action] The commissioner
may act pursuant to subsection (a)[—] by an order; provided that
before issuing the order, the commissioner shall notify the
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO
iiiiniiniiinininiiHH

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
applicant or licensee in writing of the [reason- for that
action.] commissioner's intent to act under subsection (a). The
applicant or licensee may make written [demand upon] application
the commissioner for a hearing before the commissioner to
determine the reasonableness of the commissioner's action within
ten days of the date of receipt of the notice [for a hearing
be-£ore the ■ commioaioncr to dctcr-minc the rcaoonablcneoe—o-f the
commiaoioncr-s action]. The hearing shall be held within thirty
days of receipt of the written [demaed] application and shall be
held pursuant to chapter 91[7—and-following that action,]. If
no written application for a hearing is made to the commissioner
within ten days of receipt of the notice, the commissioner may
proceed with issuing the order and, unless otherwise provided by
law, the commissioner shall without further review or hearing
renew, reinstate, or grant the license only upon receipt of an
authorization from the administering entity."
SECTION 5. Section 431:10-226.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
is amended to read as follows:
"§431:10-226.5 Notice of cancellation or nonrenewal;
notice of cancellation or nonrenewal for policies of property
insurance. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), in the
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO

Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
case of cancellation of a policy, the insurer shall give written
notice to the insured [net-] no fewer than ten days before the
effective date of cancellation. For nonrenewal of a policy, the
insurer shall give written notice to the insured [net] no fewer
than thirty days before the effective date of nonrenewal. If
under this title or a policy, a longer time period is
required for a notice of cancellation or nonrenewal for the
policy, the longer period shall be applicable. Cancellation or
nonrenewal shall not be deemed valid unless evidence of mailing
the written notice is provided.
(b) This subsection shall only apply to policies of
insurance on property used for residential purposes, including
multi-family residential properties. In the case of
cancellation of a policy, the property insurer shall give
written notice to the insured [net-] no fewer than twenty days
before the effective date of cancellation. In the case of
cancellation of a policy due to nonpayment of premium or
material misrepresentation, the property insurer shall give
written notice to the insured [net] no fewer than ten days
before the effective date of cancellation. For nonrenewal of a
policy, the property insurer shall give written notice to the
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO 9

Page 10 2282
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
insured [ftefe] rw fewer than thirty days before the effective
date of nonrenewal. If under this title or a policy, a
longer time period is required for a notice of cancellation or
nonrenewal for the policy, the longer period shall be
applicable; provided that the longer period shall be applicable
only to the insurer. Cancellation or nonrenewal shall not be
deemed valid unless evidence of mailing the written notice is
provided.
(c) All notices of cancellation or nonrenewal shall
clearly state the specific reason or reasons for cancellation or
nonrenewal."
SECTION 6. Section 431K-7.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) If the service fee is not paid on or before [August
■16 of—the year in which payment—i-o ■ due,-] the extension date, a
penalty shall be imposed in the amount of fifty per cent of the
service fee. The commissioner shall provide written notice of
the delinquency of payment and the imposition of the authorized
penalty. If the service fee and the penalty are not paid within
thirty days immediately following the date of the notice of
delinquency, the commissioner may revoke the registration of the
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO 10

Page 11
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
purchasing group and [fftay] shaJ^ not reinstate the registration
until the service fee and the penalty have been paid."
SECTION 7. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that sections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5 shall take effect on
January 1, 2027.
2026-3334 HB2282 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2282, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2282, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
36-26